Connecticut, session 2026, SB00376.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) On and after July 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Veterans Affairs shall post in a conspicuous place on
the Department of Veterans Affairs' Internet web site:
(1) A plain-language warning about individuals who seek to act in
violation of 38 USC Chapter 59, as amended from time to time, including
individuals seeking to act as agents or attorneys in the preparation,
presentation or prosecution of any claim under laws administered by
the United States Secretary of Veterans Affairs without having being
recognized for such purposes by said secretary;
(2) A link to a United States Department of Veterans Affairs online
tool through which individuals lacking the recognition described in
subdivision (1) of this section may be reported;
LCO No. 2234 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 376
(3) A link to a United States Department of Veterans Affairs online
tool through which agents, attorneys or other entities that are
recognized by the United States Secretary of Veterans Affairs for the
preparation, presentation or prosecution of any claim under laws
administered by said secretary may be searched;
(4) A link to a United States Department of Veterans Affairs Internet
web site or online tool that provides final decisions on discipline by the
United States Secretary of Veterans Affairs of agents, attorneys and
entities described in subdivision (3) of this section for violations of 38
USC Chapter 59, as amended from time to time; and
(5) A plain-language message discouraging veterans from sharing
with anyone such veterans' United States Department of Veterans
Affairs account login credentials or bank account login credentials, such
as usernames or passwords.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section